Hawaii statutes.
§144-8 Prohibited acts. The following
acts and the causing thereof within this State by any person are prohibited:

(1) The manufacture or distribution of any feed that
is adulterated or misbranded.

(2) The adulteration or misbranding of any feed.

(3) The removal or disposal of a feed in violation of
an order under section 144-11.

(4) The failure or refusal to register in accordance
with section 144-3.

(5) The violation of section 144-12(f).

(6) Failure to pay inspection fees and file reports
as required by section 144-5.

(7) The refusal to permit entry upon any public or
private premises including any vehicle of transport during business hours in
order that the department or its authorized agents can have access to any feed
and to records relating to the feed.

(8) The distribution of any toll-milled feed.

(9) The redistribution of any custom-mixed feed.

(10) The distribution within the State or importation
into the State of commercial feeds, other than custom-mixed feed, which have
not been registered in the manner provided in this chapter.

(11) The distribution within this State or importation
into the State of commercial or custom-mixed feeds which have not been labeled
in the manner provided in this chapter.

(12) The storage or transportation of toll-milled
feeds which have not been labeled in the manner provided in this chapter. [L
1959, c 275, pt of §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp,
§24-9; HRS §144-9; am L 1979, c 186, pt of §1; am and ren L 1983, c 214, pt of
§2]

Revision Note

Section
"144-3" substituted for "144-4", "144-5"
substituted for "144-6", "144-11" substituted for
"144-12", and "144-12(f)" substituted for
"144-13(f)".

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next